South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3506.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 29 Human Biological Sexes Section 1-1-1910.  For the purposes of the laws, administrative regulations, and guidelines of South Carolina: (1) An individual's sex refers to his or her biological sex, either male or female. (2) When used to refer to a natural person, "female" means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or would have, but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization. (3) When used to refer to a natural person, "male" means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or would have, but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization. (4) "Woman" means an adult human female. (5) "Girl" means a minor human female. (6) "Man," except when used as a generic reference to human beings, means an adult human male. (7) "Boy" means a minor human male. (8) "Mother" means a female parent. (9) "Father" means a male parent. (10) "Gender" when used alone to refer to males, females, or the natural differences between males and females: (a) shall be considered a synonym for sex, and (b) shall not be considered a synonym or short-hand expression for gender identity, experienced gender, gender expression, or gender role. This definition shall not apply when the term gender is used in conjunction with other words or as an adjective to modify other words, or when context or explicit definition in preexisting state law, administrative regulations, or guidelines indicates otherwise. (11) "Gender identity," if used in state law, administrative regulations, or guidelines, shall not be considered a synonym or substitute for sex or gender. Section 1-1-1920.  The definitions of "sex," "male," and "female" in Section 1-1-1910 do not preclude the reasonable accommodation of persons with a congenital and physically verifiable diagnosis of a "DSD," sometimes referred to as "disorders of sex development" or "differences in sex development." SECTION 2.  If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----